Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB931.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 15 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 211. False, deceptive or misleading names.(a) Offense defined.--Except as provided in subsection (b), an entity covered under this title or conducting business or any other activity permitted by law in this Commonwealth may not, in the fictitious name or proper name of the entity:(1) Use, or cause to be used, a word, term, symbol or device, or any combination thereof, including an electronic identifier or domain name, that contains false, deceptive or misleading terminology or is otherwise likely to cause confusion or mistake or to deceive a person regarding whether the entity is, or has any affiliation, connection, approval 12345678910111213141516171819 or association with, any of the following:(i) The Commonwealth or a municipality, including an agency, commission, board or other governmental entity of the Commonwealth or municipality, or any political subdivision thereof.(ii) The activities or official functions of the Commonwealth or a municipality, including an agency, commission, board or other governmental entity of the Commonwealth or municipality, or any political subdivision thereof.(2) Mimic or suggest governmental origin or endorsement by the Commonwealth or a municipality, including an agency, commission, board or other governmental entity of the Commonwealth or municipality, or any political subdivision thereof.(b) Authorization.--Subsection (a) does not apply to an entity that is authorized in advance, in writing, by the Commonwealth or a municipality, including an agency, commission, board or other governmental entity of the Commonwealth or municipality, or any political subdivision thereof, to conduct the activity described under subsection (a) , provided that the authorization is reported by the authorizing government agency to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the State Government Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives, no later than 10 days after becoming effective . (c) Penalty.--A person that violates this section, or conspires to violate this section, commits a felony of the third degree and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of 20250SB0931PN1050 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not more than $15,000 or to undergo a term of imprisonment of not more than seven years, or both.(d) Defense.--It shall be a defense to charges brought under this section if the entity includes a clear, conspicuous and concise disclaimer in printed or electronic materials published by or on behalf of the entity, including a website or social or other electronic media accessible by the public, and the disclaimer:(1) C learly states that the entity is not affiliated with or authorized by the Commonwealth or a municipality, including an agency, commission, board or other governmental entity of the Commonwealth or municipality, or any political subdivision thereof.(2) Is prominently placed on each page of the printed or electronic materials and is capable of being easily seen and read by users.(3) Contains lettering that is:(i) Clear, legible and stands out from the background.(ii) Set in bold Roman type.(iii) No smaller than 14-point modern type or, if the font in the rest of the text is similar in size and boldness, is at least four points larger than the largest font on the page.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0931PN1050 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930